Maine, session 132, LD969.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §85, sub-§10 is enacted to read:
10. Municipalities conducting or hosting training. The board shall adopt rules to
allow municipalities to conduct or host training for licensing under subsection 3, paragraph
A and relicensing under subsection 4, paragraph A.